Delaware, session 153, SB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4603, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4603. Term of office; compensation; assistants. (a) For appointments made after July 1, 2015, the Chief Defender shall serve for a term of 8 years from the date of appointment. (b) The Chief Defender may appoint as many assistant attorneys, clerks, investigators, stenographers and other employees as the Chief Defender considers necessary to enable the Office of Defense Services to carry out the responsibilities of the office. Assistant Public Defenders and attorneys contracting with the Office of Conflicts Counsel must be licensed to practice in this State. (c) The compensation of persons appointed under subsection (b) of this section shall be fixed by the Chief Defender. (d) The compensation of assistant attorneys appointed by the Chief Defender pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section must be at least in parity with the compensation of Deputy Attorneys General. (e) Salaried attorneys employed by the Office of Defense Services are prohibited from engaging in the practice of law outside the duties of the Office of Defense Services. Salaried attorneys who have already established private practices as of January 1, 2015, are exempt from the prohibition until May 28, 2025. After May 28, 2025, all salaried attorneys employed by the Office of Defense Services are prohibited from engaging in private law practice.